District of Columbia statutes.
5-303

Public information program; priority at the scene.

(a)

The Chief of Police shall establish a continuing public information program to inform the public, at a minimum, of which police agencies located in the District of Columbia have authority to make arrests anywhere in the District.

(b)

Any cooperative agreement with a federal law enforcement agency shall include procedures that establish clearly which agency has priority at the scene. In addition, before entering into a cooperative agreement, the Chief of Police shall make a finding as to:

(1)

Whether misconduct by the federal officers should be covered by the Police Complaint Board; and

(2)

Whether the public information program should be supplemented to inform the public of information concerning the specific cooperative agreement, and if so, how.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-100, § 4, 46 DCR 794
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 25, 53 DCR 6794

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-191, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “Police Complaint Board” for “Citizen Complaint Review Board ”